Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,270
Food establishment, food processing plant, or salvage operation; permits; application; contents; fees; late fee; exemptions.

(1) No person shall operate without a valid permit:

(a) A food establishment conducting those food handling activities authorized by such permit;

(b) A food processing plant; or

(c) A salvage operation.

(2) Application for a permit shall be made to the director on forms prescribed and furnished by the department. Such application shall include (a) the applicant's full name and mailing address and the names and addresses of any partners, members, or corporate officers, (b) whether the applicant is an individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity, (c) the location and type of proposed establishment or operation, and (d) the signature of the applicant. Application for a permit shall be made prior to the operation of a food establishment, food processing plant, or salvage operation. The application shall be accompanied by an initial permit fee and an initial fee in the same amount as the annual fee if inspections are required to be done by the department. If any food establishment, food processing plant, or salvage operation is operating without a valid permit, such establishment, plant, or operation shall pay an additional fee of sixty dollars prior to the issuance of a valid permit.

(3) Payment of the initial permit fee, the initial annual fee, and the fee for operating without a valid permit shall not preclude payment of the annual fees due on August 1 of each year. Except as provided in subsections (7) through (10) of this section and subsection (2) of section 81-2,281, a permitholder shall pay annual fees on or before August 1 of each year regardless of when the initial permit was obtained.

(4)(a) The director shall set the initial permit fee and the annual fees on or before July 1 of each fiscal year to meet the criteria in this subsection. The director may raise or lower the fees each year, but the fees shall not exceed the maximum fees listed in subdivision (4)(b) of this section. The director shall determine the fees based on the estimated annual revenue and fiscal year-end cash fund balance as follows:

(i) The estimated annual revenue shall not be greater than one hundred seven percent of program cash fund appropriations allocated for the Nebraska Pure Food Act;

(ii) The estimated fiscal year-end cash fund balance shall not be greater than seventeen percent of program cash fund appropriations allocated for the act; and

(iii) All fee increases or decreases shall be equally distributed between all categories to the nearest dollar.

(b) The maximum fees are:

SecondaryorAdditionalFoodSecondaryPreparationUnitAreaOrInitialBaseAnnualUnitsPermitAnnualFeeAnnualPermit TypeFeeFee(per area)FeeLimited RetailFood Establishment$122.00$122.00$61.00N/AItinerant Food Vendor$122.00$122.00$61.00N/ALimited Food ServiceEstablishment$122.00$122.00$61.00N/AMobile Food Unit(for each unit)$122.00N/AN/A$61.00Pushcart (for each unit)$122.00N/AN/A$24.00Vending MachineOperations:$122.00One to ten unitsN/AN/A$24.00Eleven to twenty unitsN/AN/A$49.00Twenty-one to thirtyunitsN/AN/A$73.00Thirty-one to fortyunitsN/AN/A$98.00Over forty unitsN/AN/A$122.00Food Processing Plant$122.00$171.00$61.00N/ASalvage Operation$122.00$171.00$61.00N/ACommissary$122.00$171.00$61.00N/AAll Other FoodEstablishment$122.00$171.00$61.00N/A.

(5) For a food establishment, a base annual fee includes one food preparation area and one food handling activity based upon the primary food handling activity conducted within the food establishment as determined by the department. The annual inspection fee shall also include any fees assessed for each additional food preparation area within the primary establishment and any applicable secondary food handling activity as determined by the department. Any mobile food establishment that does not return to a commissary each day shall obtain a separate permit and pay the annual fee for the mobile food establishment.

(6) If a person fails to pay any fee due under this section for more than one month after the fee is due, such person shall pay a late fee equal to fifty percent of the total fee for the first month that the fee is late and one hundred percent for the second month that the fee is late. The purpose of the late fee is to cover the administrative costs associated with collecting fees. All money collected as a late fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Pure Food Cash Fund. If the total fees due remain unpaid ninety days after the original due date, the permit shall no longer be valid.

(7)(a) Any of the following entities that is operating any type of food establishment, other than a mobile food unit or pushcart, is exempt from the requirements in subsections (1) through (6) of this section:

(i) Any educational institution;

(ii) Any health care facility;

(iii) Any nursing home; or

(iv) Any governmental organization.

(b) If any entity described in subdivision (a) of this subsection utilizes an outside food service provider, such outside food service provider shall pay any applicable fee regardless of whether the entity described in subdivision (a) of this subsection is listed as the owner on the permit.

(8) A food establishment which produces eggs and only stores, packages, sells, delivers, or otherwise provides for human consumption the eggs it produces, or only stores, packages, sells, delivers, or otherwise provides for human consumption eggs produced from no more than four producers at the same time, is exempt from the requirements of subsections (1) through (6) of this section.

(9) A food establishment or food processing plant holding a permit under the Nebraska Milk Act is exempt from the requirements of subsections (1) through (6) of this section.

(10) A single event food vendor or a religious, charitable, or fraternal organization operating any type of temporary food establishment, mobile food unit, or pushcart is exempt from the requirements of subsections (1) through (6) of this section. Any such organization operating any nontemporary food establishment prior to July 1, 1985, is exempt from the requirements of subsection (2) of this section.

(11) A permitholder may sell food prepared by the permitholder at the location of another permitholder without obtaining a separate permit at such location so long as the permitholder preparing the food is not a food processing plant. Both the permitholder preparing the food and the permitholder selling the food are responsible for compliance with the Nebraska Pure Food Act.

Laws 1981, LB 487, § 25;

Laws 1982, LB 547, § 15;

Laws 1985, LB 460, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-216.21;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 39;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 526;

Laws 1997, LB 199, § 23;

Laws 1999, LB 474, § 10;

Laws 2003, LB 250, § 8;

Laws 2004, LB 1045, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB74, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB111, § 29;

Laws 2012, LB771, § 5;

Laws 2017, LB134, § 7;

Laws 2020, LB835, § 3;

Laws 2024, LB262, § 38;

Laws 2025, LB245, § 8.

Nebraska Milk Act, see section 2-3965.